Tennessee, session 114, HB1667.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 6-54-306, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) Within the limitations of subsection (a), a home rule municipality may, by
ordinance, adopt a tiered system of monetary penalties for repeated violations of the
same municipal ordinance by the same person or entity within a twelve-month period.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 6-54-308, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) Within the limitations of subsection (a), a municipality may, by ordinance,
adopt a tiered system of monetary penalties for repeated violations of the same
municipal ordinance by the same person or entity within a twelve-month period.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-3-507, is amended by designating
the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new subsection:
(b) Within the limitations of subsection (a), a metropolitan government may, by
ordinance, adopt a tiered system of monetary penalties for repeated violations of the
same municipal ordinance by the same person or entity within a twelve-month period.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to acts and omissions on or after July 1, 2026.
HB1667
010368
- 1 -